Hawaii, session 2026, SB3320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 237, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, established a statewide food and product innovation network within the agribusiness development corporation to advance value-added manufacturing, exports, and food security. The legislature further finds that international best practices observed in Australia, New Zealand, and Singapore demonstrate that successful food innovation networks integrate: (1)  Embedded food safety and regulatory frameworks; (2)  Measurable performance indicators aligned between governing boards and legislative oversight; (3)  Coordinated logistics, tourism, and export infrastructure; (4)  Unified place-based branding strategies; and (5)  Sustained international partnerships and market access. The purpose of this Act is to strengthen the food and product innovation network by refining governance, performance accountability, regulatory integration, branding, export facilitation, and international engagement in alignment with existing law and the State's food security and economic diversification goals. SECTION 2.  Chapter 163D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By designating section 163D-20 as part IA, and inserting a title before section 163D-20 to read: "Part Ia. FOOD AND PRODUCT INNOVATION NETWORK" 2. By adding six new sections to part IA to be appropriately designated and to read: "§163D-A  Food safety and regulatory framework integration.  (a)  The food and product innovation network shall incorporate a coordinated food safety and regulatory framework across all primary and partner members. (b)  The framework shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Alignment with applicable federal and state food safety laws, regulations, rules, and food codes; (2)  Technical assistance for labeling, testing, validation, and certification requirements; (3)  Coordination with the department of health, university of Hawaii college of tropical agriculture and human resilience, and other relevant agencies; and (4)  Integration of regulatory compliance education into workforce development and training programs offered through the food and product innovation network. (c)  The corporation may enter into memoranda of agreement or other arrangements necessary to implement this section. §163D-B  Food and product innovation network; key performance indicators.  (a) In consultation with the board, the corporation shall establish key performance indicators for the food and product innovation network. (b)  The key performance indicators shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Number of businesses served and graduating to independent commercial operations; (2)  Increases in value-added agricultural and food manufacturing output; (3)  Export growth and market diversification; (4)  Workforce training and credential attainment; (5)  Contributions toward the State's food security goals; (6)  Leveraged private, federal, or philanthropic investment; and (7)  Growth in revenue and market access for small-scale producers through the utilization of shared-use processing, branding, and distribution infrastructure. (c)  The key performance indicators shall be used to inform the annual report required pursuant to section 163D-E and strategic alignment between the corporation, board, and the legislature. §163D-C  Coordination; market access.  The corporation shall develop and implement a coordinated strategy to leverage state and private sector assets to expand market access for food and value-added products, including collaboration with the department of transportation, Hawaii tourism authority, airlines, harbors, hotels, and logistics providers, to facilitate entry into national and international markets. §163D-D  State branding alignment.  (a)  In coordination with relevant state agencies, the corporation shall align and harmonize the "Hawaii made", "produced in Hawaii", and other state-supported branding initiatives related to food and value‑added products. (b) The purpose of branding alignment under this section shall be to: (1)  Reduce duplication; (2)  Strengthen brand clarity in domestic and international markets; and (3)  Maximize economic returns for producers and manufacturers. §163D-E  Surveys; economic data; reports.  (a)  Surveys administered by the department of commerce and consumer affairs and department of business, economic development, and tourism shall, where practicable, collect and leverage economic data on indigenous and Native Hawaiian businesses. (b)  Data collected pursuant to this section shall be shared with the department of business, economic development, and tourism for economic analysis and reporting purposes, subject to applicable confidentiality laws. (c)  The corporation shall submit an annual report to the legislature regarding the data collected pursuant to this section no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. §163D-F  Enterprise zones; expansion.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall evaluate opportunities to expand or adapt enterprise zone incentives in all counties to better support the food and product innovation network." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the operations of the food and product innovation network. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.